Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2412.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb S.F. 2412 Section 1. Section 2.11, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3. a. Each house of the general assembly 3 shall use the e-verify system of the United States citizenship 4 and immigration services to confirm the employment eligibility 5 of newly hired employees. 6 b. An employee may challenge the results of the submission 7 of the employeeâs information to the e-verify system of 8 the United States citizenship and immigration services by 9 submitting a challenge, including documentation proving that 10 the results are incorrect, to the legislative council within 11 ten calendar days of receipt of the results. The legislative 12 council shall review the challenge and communicate the results 13 of the appeal to the employee and the appropriate house of the 14 general assembly as soon as practicable. 15 c. Each house of the general assembly shall transmit the 16 results of the e-verify system check to the United States 17 immigration and customs enforcement and other appropriate 18 federal immigration agencies if the check shows that the 19 subject of the check does not have legal status to be present 20 in the United States after the completion of an appeal pursuant 21 to paragraph âbâ , if applicable. 22 Sec. 2. Section 2A.2, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended by 23 adding the following new paragraph: 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0i. (1) Use the e-verify system of the 25 United States citizenship and immigration services to confirm 26 the employment eligibility of newly hired employees. 27 (2) An employee may challenge the results of the submission 28 of the employeeâs information to the e-verify system of 29 the United States citizenship and immigration services by 30 submitting a challenge, including documentation proving that 31 the results are incorrect, to the legislative council within 32 ten calendar days of receipt of the results. The legislative 33 council shall review the challenge and communicate the results 34 of the appeal to the employee and the director as soon as 35 -1- SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb 1/ 6 S.F. 2412 practicable. 1 (3) The director shall transmit the results of the e-verify 2 system check to the United States immigration and customs 3 enforcement and other appropriate federal immigration agencies 4 if the check shows that the subject of the check does not 5 have legal status to be present in the United States after 6 the completion of an appeal pursuant to subparagraph (2), if 7 applicable. 8 Sec. 3. Section 2C.4, Code 2026, is amended to read as 9 follows: 10 2C.4 Citizen of United States and resident of Iowa. 11 1. The ombudsman shall be a citizen of the United States 12 and a resident of the state of Iowa, and shall be qualified to 13 analyze problems of law, administration, and public policy. 14 2. a. The ombudsman shall use the e-verify system of the 15 United States citizenship and immigration services to confirm 16 the employment eligibility of newly hired employees. 17 b. An employee may challenge the results of the submission 18 of the employeeâs information to the e-verify system of 19 the United States citizenship and immigration services by 20 submitting a challenge, including documentation proving that 21 the results are incorrect, to the legislative council within 22 ten calendar days of receipt of the results. The legislative 23 council shall review the challenge and communicate the results 24 of the appeal to the employee and the ombudsman as soon as 25 practicable. 26 c. The ombudsman shall transmit the results of the e-verify 27 system check to the United States immigration and customs 28 enforcement and other appropriate federal immigration agencies 29 if the check shows that the subject of the check does not 30 have legal status to be present in the United States after 31 the completion of an appeal pursuant to paragraph âbâ , if 32 applicable . 33 Sec. 4. Section 7E.3, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 34 following new subsection: 35 -2- SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb 2/ 6 S.F. 2412 NEW SUBSECTION . 6. Verification of United States citizenship 1 and immigration status. Use the e-verify system of the United 2 States citizenship and immigration services to confirm the 3 employment eligibility of newly hired employees. The head of 4 the department or agency shall transmit the results of the 5 e-verify system check to the United States immigration and 6 customs enforcement and other appropriate federal immigration 7 agencies if the check shows that the subject of the check does 8 not have legal status to be present in the United States after 9 the completion of an appeal pursuant to section 10A.114, if 10 applicable. 11 Sec. 5. Section 10A.101, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 12 following new subsection: 13 NEW SUBSECTION . 4. âSAVE programâ means the systematic 14 alien verification for entitlements system of the United 15 States department of homeland security and the United States 16 citizenship and immigration services. 17 Sec. 6. NEW SECTION . 10A.113 SAVE program clearinghouse. 18 1. There is created within the department a SAVE program 19 clearinghouse, which shall serve as the central entity to 20 process requests to verify, using the SAVE program, the United 21 States citizenship and immigration status of an individual 22 who has applied for a professional license in this state. 23 The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A to 24 implement this section. 25 2. The department shall transmit the results of a SAVE 26 program clearinghouse check to the United States immigration 27 and customs enforcement and other appropriate federal 28 immigration agencies if the check shows that the subject of the 29 check does not have legal status to be present in the United 30 States after the completion of an appeal pursuant to section 31 10A.114, if applicable. 32 Sec. 7. NEW SECTION . 10A.114 Citizenship and immigration 33 status ââ appeal. 34 1. The department shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 17A 35 -3- SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb 3/ 6 S.F. 2412 to allow an employee of a school district, a city, a county, 1 or the executive branch including the state board of regents 2 and each institution of higher education governed by the board, 3 or a person who has applied for a professional license in 4 this state, to challenge the results of the submission of the 5 personâs information to the SAVE program or the e-verify system 6 of the United States citizenship and immigration services with 7 the department. 8 2. A person must submit a challenge pursuant to subsection 1 9 and documentation proving that the results are incorrect within 10 ten calendar days of receipt of the results. 11 3. The department shall review a challenge submitted 12 pursuant to subsection 1 and communicate the results of the 13 appeal to the person who submitted the challenge and the hiring 14 authority or licensing board, as applicable, within seven 15 calendar days of receipt of the challenge. The decision of the 16 department is final agency action pursuant to chapter 17A. 17 Sec. 8. Section 10A.506, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 18 following new subsection: 19 NEW SUBSECTION . 13. a. The licensing and regulation 20 examining boards included in the department pursuant to 21 subsection 1 shall use the SAVE program clearinghouse created 22 within the department pursuant to section 10A.113 to verify 23 the United States citizenship and immigration status of an 24 individual who has applied for a professional license from the 25 board. 26 b. A denial of an application for a professional license due 27 to the results of the SAVE program clearinghouse check shall 28 be appealed to the director and the directorâs decision shall 29 constitute final agency action. 30 Sec. 9. NEW SECTION . 262.9E Verification of citizenship and 31 immigration status. 32 1. The state board of regents and each institution of higher 33 education governed by the board shall use the e-verify system 34 of the United States citizenship and immigration services to 35 -4- SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb 4/ 6 S.F. 2412 confirm the employment eligibility of newly hired employees. 1 2. The state board of regents and each institution of higher 2 education governed by the board shall transmit the results of 3 the e-verify system check to the United States immigration and 4 customs enforcement and other appropriate federal immigration 5 agencies if the check shows that the subject of the check does 6 not have legal status to be present in the United States after 7 the completion of an appeal pursuant to section 10A.114, if 8 applicable. 9 Sec. 10. Section 272C.1, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 10 following new subsection: 11 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. âSAVE program clearinghouseâ means 12 the SAVE program clearinghouse created within the department 13 of inspections, appeals, and licensing pursuant to section 14 10A.113. 15 Sec. 11. Section 272C.4, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 16 following new subsection: 17 NEW SUBSECTION . 11. Use the SAVE program clearinghouse to 18 confirm the United States citizenship and immigration status of 19 an individual who has applied for a professional license from 20 the board. 21 Sec. 12. Section 272C.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding 22 the following new subsection: 23 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. For a license deemed a professional 24 license by the licensing board, unlawful presence in the United 25 States, as determined by using the SAVE program clearinghouse. 26 Sec. 13. NEW SECTION . 272C.15A Disqualifications for 27 unlawful presence. 28 A licensing board established after January 1, 1978, and 29 pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, shall not issue or 30 renew a professional license to an individual who the licensing 31 board is unable to verify is lawfully present in the United 32 States, as determined by using the SAVE program clearinghouse. 33 Sec. 14. NEW SECTION . 279.89 Verification of citizenship 34 and immigration status. 35 -5- SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb 5/ 6 S.F. 2412 1. The board of directors of each school district shall 1 use the e-verify system of the United States citizenship and 2 immigration services to confirm the employment eligibility of 3 newly hired employees. 4 2. The board of directors of each school district shall 5 transmit the results of the e-verify system check to the 6 United States immigration and customs enforcement and other 7 appropriate federal immigration agencies if the check shows 8 that the subject of the check does not have legal status to be 9 present in the United States after the completion of an appeal 10 pursuant to section 10A.114, if applicable. 11 Sec. 15. Section 331.324, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 12 amended by adding the following new paragraph: 13 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0p. Use the e-verify system of the United 14 States citizenship and immigration services to confirm the 15 employment eligibility of newly hired employees. The board 16 shall transmit the results of the e-verify system check to the 17 United States immigration and customs enforcement and other 18 appropriate federal immigration agencies if the check shows 19 that the subject of the check does not have legal status to be 20 present in the United States after the completion of an appeal 21 pursuant to section 10A.114, if applicable. 22 Sec. 16. NEW SECTION . 364.26 Verification of citizenship 23 and immigration status. 24 A city shall use the e-verify system of the United States 25 citizenship and immigration services to confirm the employment 26 eligibility of newly hired employees. A city shall transmit 27 the results of the e-verify system check to the United States 28 immigration and customs enforcement and other appropriate 29 federal immigration agencies if the check shows that the 30 subject of the check does not have legal status to be present 31 in the United States after the completion of an appeal pursuant 32 to section 10A.114, if applicable. 33 -6- SF 2412 (4) 91 ss/ns/mb 6/ 6